Indiana, session 2026, HB1095.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 36-8-4.7-2, AS ADDED BY P.L.115-2016,
SECTION 3, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "appointing authority"
means:
(1) the chief executive officer, board, or other entity of a police
department with authority to appoint and hire a member of the
police department; or
(2) the chief executive officer, board, or other entity of a fire
department with authority to appoint and hire a member of the fire
department;
(3) for purposes of a school resource officer who becomes or
remains a member of the 1977 fund under IC 36-8-8-3(f) or
IC 36-8-8-3(g), the governing body of a school corporation or
the equivalent for a charter school; or
(4) for purposes of a school police officer, the governing body
of a school corporation or the equivalent for a charter school.
SECTION 2. IC 36-8-4.7-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.238-2025,
2026 IN 1095—LS 6543/DI 116


SECTION 94, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) Notwithstanding any contrary law, an
appointing authority shall waive any age restriction for a person not
more than forty (40) years and six (6) months of age that applies to the
appointment and hiring of an individual as:
(1) a member of the police department; or
(2) a member of the fire department; or
(3) a school resource officer (as defined in IC 36-8-8-2.2);
if the individual meets the requirements of subsection (b).
(b) An individual who meets all the following requirements is
entitled to the waiver described in subsection (a):
(1) On the date the individual applies to be appointed and hired
as:
(A) a member of the police department; or
(B) a member of the fire department; or
(C) a school resource officer (as defined in IC 36-8-8-2.2);
the individual is a veteran who has completed at least twenty (20)
years of military service.
(2) The individual received or is eligible to receive a discharge
from the armed forces of the United States under conditions other
than conditions set forth in IC 10-17-12-7.5(2).
(3) The individual meets all other requirements for appointment
and hiring as:
(A) a member of the police department; or
(B) a member of the fire department; or
(C) a school resource officer (as defined in IC 36-8-8-2.2);
including all physical requirements.
(c) An individual who is entitled to the waiver described in
subsection (a) is eligible to become a member of the 1977 fund.
SECTION 3. IC 36-8-8-2.1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.135-2024,
SECTION 8, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2.1. (a) As used in this chapter, "local board"
means the following:
(1) For a unit that established a 1925 fund for its police officers,
the local board described in IC 36-8-6-2.
(2) For a unit that established a 1937 fund for its firefighters, the
local board described in IC 36-8-7-3.
(3) For a consolidated city that established a 1953 fund for its
police officers, the local board described in IC 36-8-7.5-2.
(4) For a unit, other than a consolidated city, that did not establish
a 1925 fund for its police officers or a 1937 fund for its
firefighters, the local board described in subsection (b) or (c).
2026 IN 1095—LS 6543/DI 116


(5) For an airport authority, the board of an airport authority.
(6) For a school resource officer, the local board described in
subdivisions (1) through (4) that manages the fund established in
the unit or the consolidated city in which the:
(A) territory of the school corporation; or
(B) charter school;
is located. However, if more than one (1) local board is applicable
under this subdivision, the governing body of the school
corporation or the equivalent authority for the charter school that
employs or contracts to employ the school resource officer may
choose the applicable local board with respect to the school
resource officer.
(7) For a school corporation police department established
under IC 20-26-16, a local board designated under section 25
of this chapter.
(b) If a unit did not establish a 1925 fund for its police officers, a
local board shall be composed in the same manner described in
IC 36-8-6-2(b). However, if there is not a retired member of the
department, no one shall be appointed to that position until such time
as there is a retired member.
(c) If a unit did not establish a 1937 fund for its firefighters, a local
board shall be composed in the same manner described in
IC 36-8-7-3(b). However, if there is not a retired member of the
department, no one shall be appointed to that position until such time
as there is a retired member.
SECTION 4. IC 36-8-8-2.2, AS ADDED BY P.L.135-2024,
SECTION 9, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2.2. As used in this chapter, "school resource
officer" has the meaning means a law enforcement officer:
(1) with sworn authority;
(2) who is trained in school based law enforcement and crisis
response;
(3) who is assigned by a law enforcement agency to work
collaboratively with one (1) or more schools; and
(4) who has satisfied the training requirements set forth in
IC 20-26-18.2-1.
The term does not include a law enforcement officer employed by
a school corporation police department established under
IC 20-26-16.
SECTION 5. IC 36-8-8-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.135-2024,
SECTION 10, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) If a town establishes a board of metropolitan
2026 IN 1095—LS 6543/DI 116


police commissioners, or if a town becomes a city, the municipality
shall participate in the 1977 fund and shall enroll all full-time police
officers and firefighters in the 1977 fund. However, if a police officer
or former marshal is a member of the public employees' retirement
fund, the police officer or former marshal may continue as a member
of that fund instead of the 1977 fund. Notwithstanding the age
requirements under section 7(a) of this chapter, a police officer or
former marshal employed by a municipality at the time the
municipality enters the 1977 fund under this section shall be a member
of the 1977 fund unless the police officer or former marshal elects to
continue as a member of the public employees' retirement fund. A
person may become a member of the 1977 fund under this subsection
without meeting the age limitation under section 7(a) of this chapter
only if the person satisfies:
(1) any aptitude, physical agility, or physical and mental standards
established by a local board under IC 36-8-3.2; and
(2) the minimum standards that are:
(A) adopted by the system board under section 19 of this
chapter; and
(B) in effect on the date the person becomes a member of the
1977 fund.
Credit for prior service of a person who becomes a member of the 1977
fund under this subsection shall be determined under section 18 or 18.1
of this chapter. No service credit beyond that allowed under section 18
or 18.1 of this chapter may be recognized under the 1977 fund.
(b) If a unit did not establish a 1937 fund for its firefighters, the unit
may participate in the public employees' retirement fund or it may
participate in the 1977 fund. If a unit established a 1937 fund for its
firefighters, the unit is and shall remain a participant in the 1977 fund.
(c) A unit that:
(1) has not established a pension fund for its firefighters; or
(2) is participating in the public employees' retirement fund under
subsection (b);
may participate in the 1977 fund upon approval by the fiscal body,
notwithstanding IC 5-10.3-6-8. A unit that participates in the 1977 fund
under this subsection must comply with section 21 of this chapter.
However, if a police officer or firefighter is a member of the public
employees' retirement fund, the police officer or firefighter may
continue as a member of that fund instead of the 1977 fund.
(d) If a unit that participates in the 1977 fund provides longevity
increases, the amount of the longevity increase provided in a year must
be greater than or equal to the amount of the longevity increase
2026 IN 1095—LS 6543/DI 116


provided in the previous year.
(e) An airport authority may participate in the 1977 fund. An airport
authority that participates in the 1977 fund under this subsection must
comply with section 21 of this chapter. However, if a police officer or
firefighter is a member of the public employees' retirement fund, the
police officer or firefighter may continue as a member of that fund
instead of the 1977 fund.
(f) A school corporation or charter school that:
(1) employs a school resource officer; or
(2) enters into a contract or memorandum of understanding with
a local law enforcement agency to employ a school resource
officer;
(A) local law enforcement agency;
(B) private entity; or
(C) nonprofit corporation;
to employ a school resource officer;
may allow the school resource officer to participate in the 1977 fund.
A school corporation or charter school that participates in the 1977
fund employs a school resource officer under this subsection or
subsection (g) must comply with section 21.5 of this chapter and must
enter into a contract or memorandum of understanding with a
local law enforcement agency for the purpose of complying with
the reporting and payment requirements under sections 6 and 6.5
of this chapter. However, if a school resource officer is a member of
the public employees' retirement fund, the school resource officer may
continue as a member of that fund instead of the 1977 fund.
(g) A school resource officer hired or rehired after June 30, 2024,
who is a member of the 1977 fund shall remain in the 1977 fund.
(h) A school corporation or charter school that establishes a
school police department under IC 20-26-16 may participate in the
1977 fund. For purposes of this chapter, the term "police officer"
includes a school police officer who is a member of a school
corporation or charter school police department that participates
in the 1977 fund. Notwithstanding the age requirements under
section 7(a) of this chapter, a school police officer employed by a
school corporation or charter school at the time the school
corporation or charter school enters the 1977 fund under this
section shall be a member of the 1977 fund unless the school
corporation or charter school elects to continue the school police
officer as a member of the public employees' retirement fund. A
school police officer may become a member of the 1977 fund under
this subsection without meeting the age limitation under section
2026 IN 1095—LS 6543/DI 116


7(a) of this chapter only if the school police officer satisfies:
(1) any aptitude, physical agility, or physical and mental
standards established by a local board under IC 36-8-3.2; and
(2) the minimum standards that are:
(A) adopted by the system board under section 19 of this
chapter; and
(B) in effect on the date the school police officer becomes
a member of the 1977 fund.
Credit for prior service of a school police officer who becomes a
member of the 1977 fund under this subsection shall be determined
under section 18 or 18.1 of this chapter. No service credit beyond
that allowed under section 18 or 18.1 of this chapter may be
recognized under the 1977 fund.
SECTION 6. IC 36-8-8-7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.102-2023,
SECTION 9, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. (a) Subject to IC 36-8-4.7 and except as
provided in subsections (d), (e), (f), (g), (h), (k), (l), and (m), a police
officer or a firefighter who:
(1) is less than forty (40) years of age; and
(2) passes the baseline statewide physical and mental
examinations required under section 19 of this chapter;
shall be a member of the 1977 fund and is not a member of the 1925
fund, the 1937 fund, or the 1953 fund.
(b) A police officer or firefighter with service before May 1, 1977,
who is hired or rehired after April 30, 1977, may receive credit under
this chapter for service as a police officer or firefighter prior to entry
into the 1977 fund if the employer who rehires the police officer or
firefighter chooses to contribute to the 1977 fund the amount necessary
to amortize the police officer's or firefighter's prior service liability over
a period of not more than thirty (30) years, the amount and the period
to be determined by the system board. If the employer chooses to make
the contributions, the police officer or firefighter is entitled to receive
credit for the police officer's or firefighter's prior years of service
without making contributions to the 1977 fund for that prior service. In
no event may a police officer or firefighter receive credit for prior years
of service if the police officer or firefighter is receiving a benefit or is
entitled to receive a benefit in the future from any other public pension
plan with respect to the prior years of service.
(c) Except as provided in section 18 of this chapter, a police officer
or firefighter is entitled to credit for all years of service after April 30,
1977, with the police or fire department of an employer covered by this
chapter.
2026 IN 1095—LS 6543/DI 116


(d) A police officer or firefighter with twenty (20) years of service
does not become a member of the 1977 fund and is not covered by this
chapter, if the police officer or firefighter:
(1) was hired before May 1, 1977;
(2) did not convert under IC 19-1-17.8-7 or IC 19-1-36.5-7 (both
of which were repealed September 1, 1981); and
(3) is rehired after April 30, 1977, by the same employer.
(e) A police officer or firefighter does not become a member of the
1977 fund and is not covered by this chapter if the police officer or
firefighter:
(1) was hired before May 1, 1977;
(2) did not convert under IC 19-1-17.8-7 or IC 19-1-36.5-7 (both
of which were repealed September 1, 1981);
(3) was rehired after April 30, 1977, but before February 1, 1979;
and
(4) was made, before February 1, 1979, a member of a 1925,
1937, or 1953 fund.
(f) A police officer or firefighter does not become a member of the
1977 fund and is not covered by this chapter if the police officer or
firefighter:
(1) was hired by the police or fire department of a unit before May
1, 1977;
(2) did not convert under IC 19-1-17.8-7 or IC 19-1-36.5-7 (both
of which were repealed September 1, 1981);
(3) is rehired by the police or fire department of another unit after
December 31, 1981; and
(4) is made, by the fiscal body of the other unit after December
31, 1981, a member of a 1925, 1937, or 1953 fund of the other
unit.
If the police officer or firefighter is made a member of a 1925, 1937, or
1953 fund, the police officer or firefighter is entitled to receive credit
for all the police officer's or firefighter's years of service, including
years before January 1, 1982.
(g) As used in this subsection, "emergency medical services" and
"emergency medical technician" have the meanings set forth in
IC 16-18-2-110 and IC 16-18-2-112. A firefighter who:
(1) is employed by a unit that is participating in the 1977 fund;
(2) was employed as an emergency medical technician by a
political subdivision wholly or partially within the department's
jurisdiction;
(3) was a member of the public employees' retirement fund during
the employment described in subdivision (2); and
2026 IN 1095—LS 6543/DI 116


(4) ceased employment with the political subdivision and was
hired by the unit's fire department due to the reorganization of
emergency medical services within the department's jurisdiction;
shall participate in the 1977 fund. A firefighter who participates in the
1977 fund under this subsection is subject to sections 18 and 21 of this
chapter.
(h) A police officer or firefighter does not become a member of the
1977 fund and is not covered by this chapter if the individual was
appointed as:
(1) a fire chief under a waiver under IC 36-8-4-6(c); or
(2) a police chief under a waiver under IC 36-8-4-6.5(c);
unless the executive of the unit requests that the 1977 fund accept the
individual in the 1977 fund and the individual previously was a
member of the 1977 fund.
(i) A police matron hired or rehired after April 30, 1977, and before
July 1, 1996, who is a member of a police department in a second or
third class city on March 31, 1996, is a member of the 1977 fund.
(j) A park ranger who:
(1) completed at least the number of weeks of training at the
Indiana law enforcement academy or a comparable law
enforcement academy in another state that were required at the
time the park ranger attended the Indiana law enforcement
academy or the law enforcement academy in another state;
(2) graduated from the Indiana law enforcement academy or a
comparable law enforcement academy in another state; and
(3) is employed by the parks department of a city having a
population of more than one hundred ten thousand (110,000) and
less than one hundred fifty thousand (150,000);
is a member of the fund.
(k) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, a police
officer or firefighter:
(1) who is a member of the 1977 fund before a consolidation
under IC 36-3-1-5.1 or IC 36-3-1-6.1;
(2) whose employer is consolidated into the consolidated law
enforcement department or the fire department of a consolidated
city under IC 36-3-1-5.1 or IC 36-3-1-6.1; and
(3) who, after the consolidation, becomes an employee of the
consolidated law enforcement department or the consolidated fire
department under IC 36-3-1-5.1 or IC 36-3-1-6.1;
is a member of the 1977 fund without meeting the requirements under
sections 19 and 21 of this chapter.
(l) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, if:
2026 IN 1095—LS 6543/DI 116


(1) before a consolidation under IC 8-22-3-11.6, a police officer
or firefighter provides law enforcement services or fire protection
services for an entity in a consolidated city;
(2) the provision of those services is consolidated into the law
enforcement department or fire department of a consolidated city;
and
(3) after the consolidation, the police officer or firefighter
becomes an employee of the consolidated law enforcement
department or the consolidated fire department under
IC 8-22-3-11.6;
the police officer or firefighter is a member of the 1977 fund without
meeting the requirements under sections 19 and 21 of this chapter.
(m) A police officer or firefighter who is a member of the 1977 fund
under subsection (k) or (l) may not be:
(1) retired for purposes of section 10 of this chapter; or
(2) disabled for purposes of section 12 of this chapter;
solely because of a change in employer under the consolidation.
(n) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter and subject
to subsection (o), a police officer, school resource officer, or
firefighter who:
(1) is an active member of the 1977 fund with an employer that
participates in the 1977 fund;
(2) separates from that employer; and
(3) not later than one hundred eighty (180) days after the date of
the separation described in subdivision (2), becomes employed as
a full-time police officer, school resource officer, or firefighter
with the same or a second employer that participates in the 1977
fund;
is a member of the 1977 fund without meeting for a second time the
age limitation under subsection (a) and the requirements under sections
19 and 21 of this chapter. A police officer, school resource officer, or
firefighter to whom this subsection applies is entitled to receive credit
for all years of 1977 fund covered service as a police officer, school
resource officer, or firefighter with all employers that participate in
the 1977 fund.
(o) The one hundred eighty (180) day limitation described in
subsection (n)(3) does not apply to a member of the 1977 fund who is
eligible for reinstatement under IC 36-8-4-11.
(p) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, a veteran
who is:
(1) described in IC 36-8-4.7; and
(2) employed as a firefighter, or police officer, or school
2026 IN 1095—LS 6543/DI 116


resource officer;
is a member of the 1977 fund.
(q) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter and except
as provided in subsection (o), a police officer, school resource officer,
or firefighter who:
(1) is an active member of the 1977 fund with an employer that
participates in the 1977 fund;
(2) separates from that employer; and
(3) more than one hundred eighty (180) days after the date of the
separation described in subdivision (2), becomes employed as a
full-time police officer, school resource officer, or firefighter
with the same or a second employer that participates in the 1977
fund;
is a member of the 1977 fund without meeting the age limitation under
subsection (a) provided the member can accrue twenty (20) years of
service credit in the 1977 fund by the time the police officer, school
resource officer, or firefighter becomes sixty (60) years of age. A
police officer, school resource officer, or firefighter who participates
in the 1977 fund under this subsection must pass the baseline statewide
physical and mental examination under section 19 of this chapter. A
police officer, school resource officer, or firefighter to whom this
subsection applies is entitled to receive credit for all years of 1977 fund
covered service as a police officer, school resource officer, or
firefighter with all employers that participate in the 1977 fund.
SECTION 7. IC 36-8-8-21.5, AS ADDED BY P.L.135-2024,
SECTION 13, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 21.5. (a) This section applies to a school resource
officer that becomes or remains a member of the 1977 fund under
section 3(f) or 3(g) of this chapter.
(b) A school resource officer is a member of the 1977 fund if the
school resource officer:
(1) subject to IC 36-8-4.7-5, meets the age limitation under
section 7(a) of this chapter;
(2) passes the baseline statewide physical and mental
examinations required under section 19 of this chapter; and
(3) meets the training requirements under IC 20-26-18.2-1.
(c) Credit for prior service of a school resource officer who becomes
a member of the 1977 fund under this section shall be determined
under section 18 or 18.1 of this chapter. No service credit beyond that
allowed under section 18 or 18.1 of this chapter may be recognized
under the 1977 fund.
SECTION 8. IC 36-8-8-25 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
2026 IN 1095—LS 6543/DI 116


AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 25. (a) This section applies to a school corporation
police department established under IC 20-26-16.
(b) The governing body of one (1) or more school corporations,
or the equivalent for a charter school, may designate either of the
following as the local board for a school corporation police
department:
(1) A local board described in section 2.1(a)(1), 2.1(a)(3), or
2.1(a)(4) of this chapter.
(2) A board of trustees established under subsection (c).
(c) If the governing body of one (1) or more school corporations,
or the equivalent for a charter school, designates a board of
trustees under subsection (b)(2) to serve as the local board, the
following apply:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, the board
of trustees must consist of at least seven (7) but not more than
nine (9) trustees, as follows:
(A) A school superintendent or the school superintendent's
designee, a school fiscal officer or the school fiscal officer's
designee, and a police chief of a participating school police
department, who are ex officio voting members of the
board of trustees.
(B) One (1) retired member of a participating school police
department. However, if there is not a retired member of
a participating school police department, no one shall be
appointed under this subdivision until such time as there
is a retired member.
(C) At least three (3) but not more than five (5) active
members of a participating police department.
However, for a board of trustees established under this
subsection where there are not sufficient members of a school
police department to appoint a local board of trustees under
this subsection consisting of at least five (5) trustees, the local
board of trustees appointed under this subsection may be
composed of three (3) trustees, those being the superintendent
or the superintendent's designee, the school fiscal officer or
the school fiscal officer's designee, and the school police
department chief. The trustees are selected in a manner
prescribed by the governing body for a school corporation or
the equivalent for a charter school. If the board of trustees
will manage two (2) or more school police departments, the
members shall be selected in a manner agreed upon by the
2026 IN 1095—LS 6543/DI 116


participating school corporations or charter schools. The
trustees shall serve at the pleasure of the appointing
authority.
(2) A majority of all the trustees constitutes a quorum for the
transaction of business.
(3) The trustees receive no pay for their services.
(4) The board of trustees may make all necessary bylaws for:
(A) meetings of the trustees;
(B) all matters connected with the care, preservation, and
disbursement of the fund; and
(C) all other matters connected with the proper execution
of this chapter.
(5) For purposes of IC 36-8-6-3, the school superintendent or
the school superintendent's designee described in subdivision
(1)(A) is considered the president, and the school fiscal officer
or the school fiscal officer's designee described in subdivision
(1)(A) is considered the treasurer.
2026 IN 1095—LS 6543/DI 116